Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-2704.63
Youth sports event, youth sports
league, or youth competitive educational activity; exemption.

(1) Sales and use
taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, use, or other
consumption of amounts charged to participate in a youth sports event, youth
sports league, or youth competitive educational activity by political subdivisions
or organizations that are exempt from income tax under section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) For purposes
of this section:

(a) Competitive educational activity means a tournament or a single
competition that occurs over a limited period of time annually or intermittently
where the participants engage in a competitive educational activity;

(b) Sports event
means a tournament or a single competition that occurs over a limited period
of time annually or intermittently where the participants engage in a sport;

(c) Sports league
means an organized series of sports competitions taking place over several
weeks or months between teams or individuals that are members of the league;
and

(d)
Youth sports event, youth sports league, or youth competitive educational
activity means an event, league, or activity that is restricted to participants
who are less than nineteen years of age.

Laws 2012, LB727, § 37.